dictsource/ku_rules
// Kurdish translation rules
// This file is UTF-8 encoded

.L01 î iy ê ew ey   // front vowels

.group a
        a        a

     @) a (_S1   %a
     @) an (_S2  %an

.group b
        b        b

.group c
        c        dZ

.group ç
        ç        tS

.group d
        d        d

.group e
        e        E
        e (_     E#
        ew       eU
        ey       eI

.group ê
        ê        e

     @) ê (_S1   %e
     @) ên (_S2  %en


.group f
        f        f

.group g
        g        g
        g (L01   J

.group h
        h        h

.group i
        i        I

.group î
        î        i

.group j
        j        Z

.group k
        k        k
        k (L01   c

.group l
        l        l

.group m
        m        m

.group n
        n        n

.group o
        o        o

.group p
        p        p

.group q
        q        q

.group r
        r        R
        rr       R
     A) r (A     *

.group s
        s        s

.group ş
        ş        S

.group t
        t        t

.group u
        u        y

.group û
        û        u

        û (_     u

.group v
        v        v

.group w
        w        w

.group x
        x        x
        xwe      xwE

.group y
        y        j

.group z
        z        z

.group
        ö        I:
        ü        y
        $        dUlar
